Mississippi, session 2026, HB1726.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 43-26-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-26-1.  (1)  There is created a Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services. (2)  The Chief Administrative Officer of the Department of Child Protection Services shall be the Commissioner of Child Protection Services who shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate.  The commissioner shall possess the following qualifications: (a)  A bachelor's degree from an accredited institution of higher learning and ten (10) years' experience in management, public administration, finance or accounting; or (b)  A master's or doctoral degree from an accredited institution of higher learning and five (5) years' experience in management, public administration, finance, law or accounting. (3)  The Department of Child Protection Services shall provide the services authorized by law to every individual determined to be eligible therefor, and in carrying out the purposes of the department, the commissioner is authorized: (a)  To formulate the policy of the department regarding child welfare services within the jurisdiction of the department; (b)  To adopt, modify, repeal and promulgate, after due notice and hearing, and where not otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, to make exceptions to and grant exemptions and variances from, and to enforce rules and regulations implementing or effectuating the powers and duties of the department under any and all statutes within the department's jurisdiction; (c)  To apply for, receive and expend any federal or state funds or contributions, gifts, devises, bequests or funds from any other source; (d)  To enter into and execute contracts, grants and cooperative agreements with any federal or state agency or subdivision thereof, or any public or private institution located inside or outside the State of Mississippi, or any person, corporation or association in connection with carrying out the programs of the department; * * *and (f)  To contract with private child placement agencies, which are licensed by the department, to assist in adoption services; and (e)  To discharge such other duties, responsibilities, and powers as are necessary to implement the programs of the department. (4)  The commissioner shall establish the organizational structure of the Department of Child Protection Services, which shall include the creation of any units necessary to implement the duties assigned to the department and consistent with specific requirements of law. (5)  The commissioner shall appoint heads of offices, bureaus, and divisions, as defined in Section 7-17-11, who shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner.  The salary and compensation of such office, bureau and division heads shall be subject to the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the State Personnel Board. The commissioner shall have the authority to organize offices as deemed appropriate to carry out the responsibilities of the department. (6)  The Department of Child Protection Services shall be responsible for the development, execution, and provision of services in the following areas: (a)  Protective services for children; (b)  Foster care; (c)  Adoption services; (d)  Special services; (e)  Interstate compact; (f)  Licensure; (g)  Prevention services; and (h)  Such other services as may be designated.  Services enumerated under Section 43-15-13 et seq., for the foster care program shall be provided by qualified staff with appropriate case loads. (7)  The Department of Child Protection Services shall have the following powers and duties: (a)  To provide basic services and assistance statewide to needy and disadvantaged individuals and families; (b)  To promote integration of the many services and programs within its jurisdiction at the client level thus improving the efficiency and effectiveness of service delivery and providing easier access to clients; (c)  To employ personnel and expend funds appropriated to the department to carry out the duties and responsibilities assigned to the department by law; (d)  To fingerprint and conduct a background investigation on every employee, contractor, subcontractor and volunteer: (i)  Who has direct access to clients of the department who are children or vulnerable adults; (ii)  Who is in a position of fiduciary responsibility; (iii)  Who is in a position with access to Federal Tax Information (FTI); or (iv)  Who is otherwise required by federal law or regulations to undergo a background investigation. Every such employee, contractor, subcontractor and volunteer shall provide a valid current social security number and/or driver's license number, which shall be furnished to conduct the background investigation for determination as to good moral character and to ensure that no person placed in any position referenced in this paragraph (d) has a felony conviction that would prevent employment or access to Federal Tax Information according to department policy.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a fingerprint-based national criminal history record check.  The department shall be the recipient of the results of any background investigation and/or criminal history record check performed in accordance with this paragraph; (e)  To establish and maintain programs not inconsistent with the terms of this chapter and the rules, regulations and policies of the Department of Child Protection Services, and publish the rules and regulations of the department pertaining to such programs; (f)  To provide all other child welfare programs and services previously provided by the Department of Human Services or a division thereof; and (g)  Make such reports in such form and containing such information as the federal government may, from time to time, require, and comply with such provisions as the federal government may, from time to time, find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of such reports. (8)  The Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services shall submit a copy of the federal Annual Progress and Services Report (APSR) to the Chair of the Senate Public Health and Welfare Committee, the Chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the Chair of the House Public Health and Human Services Committee, the Chair of the House Appropriations Committee, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Governor by December 1 of each year. (9)  (a)  The Commissioner of Child Protection Services shall hire a Coordinator of Services for Victims of Human Trafficking and Commercial Sexual Exploitation within the Department of Child Protection Services whose duties shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (i)  To form specialized human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation assessment teams to respond on an as-needed basis to act as an emergency, separate and specialized response and assessment team to rapidly respond to the needs of children who are victims of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation; (ii)  To identify victims of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation; (iii)  To monitor, record and distribute federal human trafficking funds received by the Department of Child Protection Services; (iv)  To employ staff to investigate allegations of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation; and (v)  To develop and coordinate services within the Department of Child Protection Services and with outside service providers for victims of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation. (b)  The Commissioner of Child Protection Services shall develop standard operating procedures for the investigation, custody and services provided to alleged victims of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation. (c)  The Commissioner shall require two (2) hours of training regarding the subject of identifying, assessing, and providing comprehensive services to a child who has experienced or is alleged to have experienced commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking.  The training must be incorporated into the pre-service training requirements of all Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services family specialists, adoption specialists, licensure specialists, direct supervisors of family protection specialists, direct supervisors of adoption specialists, and direct supervisors of licensure specialists. (10)  This section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2028. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.